Utah statutes.
7-7-30.   Investment in property used in conduct of business -- Investment
in manner not prohibited by law.
(1)  An association may invest in such real property or interest therein as
the directors may deem necessary or convenient for the conduct of the business
of the association, which for the purposes of this chapter may include the
stock of a wholly owned subsidiary corporation having as its exclusive
activity the ownership and management of such property or interests, but the
amount so invested may not exceed 10% of the assets of the association, except
that the commissioner may authorize a greater amount to be so invested if he
finds that the investments promote the viability and stability of the
associations of this state.  An association may invest a reasonable amount in
property such as furniture, fixtures, and equipment for use in carrying on its
own business.
(2)  Every association may invest its assets in a manner not expressly
prohibited by law if the investments are made in the exercise of the judgment
and care under the circumstances then prevailing which men of prudence,
discretion, and intelligence exercise in the management of their own affairs
not in regard to speculation but in regard to the permanent disposition of
their funds, considering the probable income as well as the probable safety of
their capital.  The aggregate of investments held under this subsection and
not permitted by any other section of this chapter may not exceed 5% of the
assets of the association.
